Missouri, session 2026, HB2262.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 191.730 and 191.744, to read as follows:
191.730. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Health care professional", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(2) "Mental disorder", the same meaning given to the term in section 630.005;
(3) "Mental illness", the same meaning given to the term in section 630.005;
(4) "Screening tool", a tool or tools designed to screen pregnant women for
mental disorders and mental illnesses.
2. This section applies only to health care professionals who provide maternity
health care services.
3. Each health care professional shall, through the use of a validated and
evidence-based verbal screening tool, screen for mental disorders and mental illnesses in
all pregnant women who are seen by the health care professional as early as practicable
at the onset of prenatal care and throughout the pregnancy, including during the first,
second, and third trimesters.
4. The department of health and senior services shall establish guidelines for
health care professionals treating mental disorders and mental illnesses in pregnancy.
The department shall make the guidelines available on its website.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2262 2
5. If, after using the screening tool, a health care professional identifies a
pregnant woman who has a mental disorder or mental illness and is not currently
receiving treatment for such disorder or illness, the health care professional shall:
(1) Provide treatment to the patient; or
(2) Refer the patient for treatment.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize violation of the
confidentiality requirements of any state or federal law.
191.744. The department of health and senior services shall establish a perinatal
navigator program for the purposes of engaging pregnant women in early prenatal care
and providing referrals to pregnant women for wraparound services and home visiting
programs in the local community.
✔